Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-242
All-lines insurer; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-242 to 44-247, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) An all-lines insurer shall mean an insurer authorized to write more than one line of insurance included in a life insurance class of insurance and one or more lines of insurance included in a property and liability class of insurance;

(2) Life insurance class of insurance shall mean the lines of insurance specified in subdivisions (1) through (4) of section 44-201; and

(3) Property and liability class of insurance shall mean the lines of insurance specified in subdivisions (4) through (14) and (16) through (20) of section 44-201, except that, with respect to any particular all-lines insurer, the line of insurance specified in subdivision (4) of section 44-201 may be included in either the life insurance class of insurance or property and liability class of insurance but shall not be included in both classes or, without the approval of the department, transferred from one class to another.

Laws 1979, LB 332, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 87.